Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.256

Advanced registered nurse practitioner—Scope of practice—Document attestation. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

An advanced registered nurse practitioner may sign and attest to any certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that a physician may sign, so long as it is within the advanced registered nurse practitioner's scope of practice.

[ 2015 c 104 s 1.]

PDFRCW 18.79.256

Advanced practice registered nurse—Scope of practice—Document attestation. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

An advanced practice registered nurse may sign and attest to any certificates, cards, forms, or other required documentation that a physician may sign, so long as it is within the advanced practice registered nurse's scope of practice.

[ 2024 c 239 s 14; 2015 c 104 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.